src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v3piera !!≈ **@CODE@** pierä:pie
+V+Inf:r^A K ; !! * pitää tehdä ^D
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ree K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>rh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>r%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>rthiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>rh^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>rthiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>re^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>r%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>^N^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>t^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>rr%>^U%>t K ; 
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>rhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>r PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>^N%>ee%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>r%>^N%>ee%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>r%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>r%>e K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>r%>i4sin K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>r%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>r%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>r%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>r%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>r%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>r%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>r%>e K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>r%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>r%>e^WG%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>r%>e^WG%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>r%>e^WG%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>r%>e^WG%>m^All^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>r%>e^WG%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v3juosta !!≈ **@CODE@** juosta:juo
+V+Inf:s%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ksee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>sth^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ksi K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>sthiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>sth^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>sthiin K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>kse v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>ksi v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:s%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:s%>^N^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>st^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>st^U K ; !Täytyy löytää oikean muodon
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:s%>hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:s%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:ksee%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:ksee%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>st^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>st^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>kse K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>ksisin K ; ! juoksisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>ksisit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>ksis K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ksisimm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>ksisitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>stais K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>stais K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>kse K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>sk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>kse%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>kse%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>kse%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>kse%>m^All^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>kse%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:%>kse%>m^A MATON ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:ksemi n_22_inen ;

!! ### Verbiluokat v4...

LEXICON v4 !!≈ **@CODE@** vanheta:vanhe, pajeta:pake
+V+Inf:^WG%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:nee K ; !
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ni K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG%>thiin K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>ne v12pers_long ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>ni v12pers_long ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGn%>^U K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:^WGn%>^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>tt%>^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t%>^U%>t K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>ne%>^V%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>ne%>^V%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>tt^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>tt^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>ne K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>nisin K ; ! vanhenisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>nisit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>nis K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>nisim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>nisitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:^WG%>tt^Ais K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:^WG%>tt^Ais K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>ne K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:^WG%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>ne%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>ne%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>ne%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>ne%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>ne%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:%>ne%>m^A MATONodd ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:nemi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v4_itte !!≈ **@CODE@** ja vartalo on - kyyti
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ttee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>tti K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>tte v12pers_long ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>tti v12pers_long ;
!!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>ttenn^U K ; !! * Pitkä partisiippi
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>n^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>n^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^U%>t K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
!! +V+Act+PrfPrc:tte%>nnhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tte%>^V%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>tte%>^V%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>tt^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>tte K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>ttisin K ; ! kyytittisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>ttisit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>ttis K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ttisim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>ttisitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>tt^Ais K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>tt^Ais K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>tte K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>tte%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>tte%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>tte%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>tte%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>tte%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:%>tte%>m^A MATONodd ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:ttemi n_22_inen ;


LEXICON v4_oitte !!≈ **@CODE@** ja vartalo on haravoi-
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:%>đ^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ttee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>tti K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>tte v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>tti v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>n^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^U%>t K ; 
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
!! +V+PrfPrc:tte%>nnhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>tt^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>tte K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>ttisin K ; ! haravoittisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>ttisit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>ttis K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ttisimm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>ttisitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>tt%>^Ais K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>tt%>^Ais K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>tte K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>tte%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>tte%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>tte%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>tte%>m^All^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>tte%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:%>tte%>m^A MATON ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:ttemi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v43 !!≈ **@CODE@** hantteerata:hantteera
+V+Inf:^WG%>t^A K ; !
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^V K ; !
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>s K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>si K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG%>thiin K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:%>^V v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>si v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>nn^U K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:^WG%>nn^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>tt^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t^U%>t K ; 
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^V%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^V%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>tt^A%>v^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>tt^A%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>^V K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i7sin K ; ! hantteeraisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i7sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i7s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i7sim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i7sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:^WG%>tt^A%>i7s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:^WG%>tt^A%>i7s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>^V K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>^V^WG%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>^V%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>^V%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>^V%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>^V%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>^V%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Inf3:%>^V%>m^A MATONodd ;
+V+Der+Der/minen:%>^V%>mi n_22_inen ;
