src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
piestä:pie v3juosta ; ! XXX taipuu kuten juosta, mutta jatkoleksikko ei toimi
juosta:juo v3juosta ;
pierä:pie v3piera ;
parata:para v4 ;
hapata:happa v4 ;
vanheta:vanhe v4 ;
laajeta:laaje v4 ;
lapota:lappo v4 ;
lyhetä:lyhe v4 ;
pimetä:pime v4 ;
tyyhetä:tyyhe v4 ;
vaimeta:vaime v4 ;
lähetä:lähe v4 ;
vähetä:vähe v4 ;
lujeta:luje v4 ;
pajeta:pake v4 ;
vaijeta:vaike v4 ;
liijetä:liike v4 ;
lijetä:like v4 ;
oijeta:oike v4 ;
muijeta:muike v4 ;
valjeta:valke v4 ;
seljetä:selke v4 ;
souketa:soukke v4 ;
tarjeta:tarke v4 ;
aueta:auke v4 ;
kyetä:kyke v4 ;
pehmetä:pehme v4 ;
kuumeta:kuume v4 ;
pienetä:piene v4 ;
lämmetä:lämpe v4 ;
kevetä:keve v4 ;
kylmetä:kylme v4 ;
nuoreta:nuore v4 ;
värretä:värre v4 ;
suureta:suure v4 ;
eđetä:ete v4 ;
piđetä:pite v4 ;
levetä:leve v4 ;
huonota:huono v4 ;
isota:iso v4 ;
mäđätä:mätä v4 ;
korjeta:korke v4 ;
rohjeta:rohke v4 ;
degradeerata:degradeera v43 ; ! nowac
provideerata:provideera v43 ; ! nowac
refundeerata:refundeera v43 ; ! nowac
ekskludeerata:ekskludeera v43 ; ! nowac
erigeerata:erigeera v43 ; ! nowac
konjugeerata:konjugeera v43 ; ! nowac
repatrieerata:repatrieera v43 ; ! nowac
marsjeerata:marsjeera v43 ; ! nowac
flankeerata:flankeera v43 ; ! nowac
parkkeerata:parkkeera v43 ;
reetableerata:reetableera v43 ; ! nowac
emballeerata:emballeera v43 ; ! nowac
demoleerata:demoleera v43 ; ! nowac
matrikuleerata:matrikuleera v43 ; ! nowac
kveruleerata:kveruleera v43 ; ! nowac
komprimeerata:komprimeera v43 ; ! nowac
deformeerata:deformeera v43 ; ! nowac
geneerata:geneera v43 ; ! nowac
defineerata:defineera v43 ; ! nowac
urineerata:urineera v43 ; ! nowac
fisjoneerata:fisjoneera v43 ; ! nowac
revolusjoneerata:revolusjoneera v43 ; ! nowac
detoneerata:detoneera v43 ; ! nowac
dupeerata:dupeera v43 ; ! nowac
aspireerata:aspireera v43 ; ! nowac
filtreerata:filtreera v43 ; ! nowac
tortureerata:tortureera v43 ; ! nowac
kvalifiseerata:kvalifiseera v43 ; ! nowac
identifiseerata:identifiseera v43 ; ! nowac
legaliseerata:legaliseera v43 ; ! nowac
kanaliseerata:kanaliseera v43 ; ! nowac
nøytraliseerata:nøytraliseera v43 ; ! nowac
sensibiliseerata:sensibiliseera v43 ; ! nowac
multipliseerata:multipliseera v43 ; ! nowac
galvaniseerata:galvaniseera v43 ; ! nowac
polariseerata:polariseera v43 ; ! nowac
pasteuriseerata:pasteuriseera v43 ; ! nowac
delprivatiseerata:delprivatiseera v43 ; ! nowac
tapeettiseerata:tapeettiseera v43 ;
lanseerata:lanseera v43 ; ! nowac
reverseerata:reverseera v43 ; ! nowac
akkrediteerata:akkrediteera v43 ; ! nowac
fundamenteerata:fundamenteera v43 ; ! nowac
promoteerata:promoteera v43 ; ! nowac
arresteerata:arresteera v43 ; ! nowac
rekrutteerata:rekrutteera v43 ; ! nowac
skraveerata:skraveera v43 ; ! nowac
masseerata:masseera v43 ;
keritä+Hom2:keri v4_itte ; ! keritten, kerittin
ansaita:ansai v4_itte ;
havaita:havai v4_itte ;
karhita:karhi v4_itte ;
palkita:palki v4_itte ;
tulkita:tulki v4_itte ;
parkita:parki v4_itte ;
merkitä:merki v4_itte ;
suvaita:suvai v4_itte ;
valita:vali v4_itte ;
hallita:halli v4_itte ;
hillitä:hilli v4_itte ;
villitä:villi v4_itte ;
mullita:mulli v4_itte ;
risthiinnaulita:risthiin#nauli v4_itte ;
tuomita:tuomi v4_itte ;
mainita:maini v4_itte ;
punnita:punni v4_itte ;
vieritä:vieri v4_itte ;
häiritä:häiri v4_itte ;
praatita:praati v4_itte ;
vaatita:vaati v4_itte ;
kyytitä:kyyti v4_itte ;
kevitä:kevi v4_itte ;
siivitä:siivi v4_itte ;
sijaita:sijai v4_itte ;
tarvita:tarvi v4_itte ;
riemuita:riemui v4_itte ;
iloita:iloi v4_itte ;
sivakoita:sivakoi v4_oitte ;
palmikoita:palmikoi v4_oitte ;
joutiloita:joutiloi v4_oitte ;
markkinoita:markkinoi v4_oitte ;
kiharoita:kiharoi v4_oitte ;
kiikaroita:kiikaroi v4_oitte ;
piikaroita:piikaroi v4_oitte ;
nikkaroita:nikkaroi v4_oitte ;
naakkaroita:naakkaroi v4_oitte ;
palavoita:palavoi v4_oitte ;
haravoita:haravoi v4_oitte ;
haparoita:haparoi v4_oitte ;
kapaloita:kapaloi v4_oitte ;
kävelöitä:kävelöi v4_oitte ;
kömpyröitä:kömpyröi v4_oitte ;
ympäröitä:ympäröi v4_oitte ;
elämöitä:elämöi v4_oitte ;
kinneröitä:kinneröi v4_oitte ;
kommentoita:kommentoi v4_oitte ;
hutiloita:hutiloi v4_oitte ;
imuroita:imuroi v4_oitte ;
karitoita:karitoi v4_oitte ;
taikuroita:taikuroi v4_oitte ;
